Utah statutes.
7-9-12.   Contents of bylaws.

The bylaws of a credit union shall specify at least the following:

(1)  the name of the credit union;

(2)  the purpose for which the credit union was formed;

(3)  a field of membership of the credit union that complies with Section 7-9-51 or 7-9-53;

(4)  the number of directors and procedures for their election;

(5)  the term of directors;

(6)  whether a credit manager, credit committee, or combination of both shall be responsible for credit functions of the credit union;

(7)  the duties of the officers;

(8)  the time of year of the annual meeting of members;

(9)  the manner in which members shall be notified of meetings;

(10)  the number of members which shall constitute a quorum at meetings;

(11)  the manner of amending;

(12)  the manner in which officers may act as surety; and

(13)  such other matters, rules, and regulations as the board of directors consider necessary.



Amended by Chapter 327, 2003 General Session

